vim/st.aff
FLAG long
SFX f0 Y 33
SFX f0 ir ir/ ir
SFX f0 ir issant/ ir
SFX f0 ir is/ ir
SFX f0 ir it/ ir
SFX f0 ir issons/ ir
SFX f0 ir issez/ ir
SFX f0 ir issent/ ir
SFX f0 ir issais/ ir
SFX f0 ir issait/ ir
SFX f0 ir issions/ ir
SFX f0 ir issiez/ ir
SFX f0 ir issaient/ ir
SFX f0 ir îmes/ ir
SFX f0 ir îtes/ ir
SFX f0 ir irent/ ir
SFX f0 ir irai/ ir
SFX f0 ir iras/ ir
SFX f0 ir ira/ ir
SFX f0 ir irons/ ir
SFX f0 ir irez/ ir
SFX f0 ir iront/ ir
SFX f0 ir irais/ ir
SFX f0 ir irait/ ir
SFX f0 ir irions/ ir
SFX f0 ir iriez/ ir
SFX f0 ir iraient/ ir
SFX f0 ir isse/ ir
SFX f0 ir isses/ ir
SFX f0 ir isse/ ir
SFX f0 ir ît/ ir
SFX f0 ir is/ ir
SFX f0 ir issons/ ir
SFX f0 ir issez/ ir

SFX fA Y 38
SFX fA aïr aïr/ aïr
SFX fA aïr aïssant/ aïr
SFX fA aïr aï/ aïr
SFX fA aïr aïs/ aïr
SFX fA aïr aïe/ aïr
SFX fA aïr aïes/ aïr
SFX fA aïr ais/ aïr
SFX fA aïr ait/ aïr
SFX fA aïr aïssons/ aïr
SFX fA aïr aïssez/ aïr
SFX fA aïr aïssent/ aïr
SFX fA aïr aïssais/ aïr
SFX fA aïr aïssait/ aïr
SFX fA aïr aïssions/ aïr
SFX fA aïr aïssiez/ aïr
SFX fA aïr aïssaient/ aïr
SFX fA aïr aïs/ aïr
SFX fA aïr aït/ aïr
SFX fA aïr aïmes/ aïr
SFX fA aïr aïtes/ aïr
SFX fA aïr aïrent/ aïr
SFX fA aïr aïrai/ aïr
SFX fA aïr aïras/ aïr
SFX fA aïr aïra/ aïr
SFX fA aïr aïrons/ aïr
SFX fA aïr aïrez/ aïr
SFX fA aïr aïront/ aïr
SFX fA aïr aïrais/ aïr
SFX fA aïr aïrait/ aïr
SFX fA aïr aïrions/ aïr
SFX fA aïr aïriez/ aïr
SFX fA aïr aïraient/ aïr
SFX fA aïr aïsse/ aïr
SFX fA aïr aïsses/ aïr
SFX fA aïr aïsse/ aïr
SFX fA aïr ais/ aïr
SFX fA aïr aïssons/ aïr
SFX fA aïr aïssez/ aïr

SFX fB Y 29
SFX fB haïr haïr/ aïr
SFX fB haïr haïssant/ aïr
SFX fB haïr haï/ aïr
SFX fB haïr haïs/ aïr
SFX fB haïr haïe/ aïr
SFX fB haïr haïes/ aïr
SFX fB haïr hait/ aïr
SFX fB haïr haïssons/ aïr
SFX fB haïr haïssez/ aïr
SFX fB haïr haïssent/ aïr
SFX fB haïr haïssait/ aïr
SFX fB haïr haïssions/ aïr
SFX fB haïr haïssiez/ aïr
SFX fB haïr haïssaient/ aïr
SFX fB haïr haït/ aïr
SFX fB haïr haïmes/ aïr
SFX fB haïr haïtes/ aïr
SFX fB haïr haïrent/ aïr
SFX fB haïr haïra/ aïr
SFX fB haïr haïrons/ aïr
SFX fB haïr haïrez/ aïr
SFX fB haïr haïront/ aïr
SFX fB haïr haïrait/ aïr
SFX fB haïr haïrions/ aïr
SFX fB haïr haïriez/ aïr
SFX fB haïr haïraient/ aïr
SFX fB haïr haïsse/ aïr
SFX fB haïr haïssons/ aïr
SFX fB haïr haïssez/ aïr

SFX fC Y 11
SFX fC partir partir/ impartir
SFX fC partir partissant/ impartir
SFX fC partir parti/ impartir
SFX fC partir partis/ impartir
SFX fC partir partie/ impartir
SFX fC partir parties/ impartir
SFX fC partir partis/ impartir
SFX fC partir partit/ impartir
SFX fC partir partissons/ impartir
SFX fC partir partissez/ impartir
SFX fC partir partissent/ impartir

SFX fD Y 12
SFX fD ortir ortir/ sortir
SFX fD ortir ortissant/ sortir
SFX fD ortir ortit/ sortir
SFX fD ortir ortissent/ sortir
SFX fD ortir ortissait/ sortir
SFX fD ortir ortissaient/ sortir
SFX fD ortir ortira/ sortir
SFX fD ortir ortiront/ sortir
SFX fD ortir ortirait/ sortir
SFX fD ortir ortiraient/ sortir
SFX fD ortir ortisse/ sortir
SFX fD ortir ortît/ sortir

SFX fY Y 37
SFX fY uïr uïr/ uïr
SFX fY uïr uïssant/ uïr
SFX fY uïr uï/ uïr
SFX fY uïr uïs/ uïr
SFX fY uïr uïe/ uïr
SFX fY uïr uïes/ uïr
SFX fY uïr uïs/ uïr
SFX fY uïr uït/ uïr
SFX fY uïr uïssons/ uïr
SFX fY uïr uïssez/ uïr
SFX fY uïr uïssent/ uïr
SFX fY uïr uïssais/ uïr
SFX fY uïr uïssait/ uïr
SFX fY uïr uïssions/ uïr
SFX fY uïr uïssiez/ uïr
SFX fY uïr uïssaient/ uïr
SFX fY uïr uîmes/ uïr
SFX fY uïr uîtes/ uïr
SFX fY uïr uïrent/ uïr
SFX fY uïr uïrai/ uïr
SFX fY uïr uïras/ uïr
SFX fY uïr uïra/ uïr
SFX fY uïr uïrons/ uïr
SFX fY uïr uïrez/ uïr
SFX fY uïr uïront/ uïr
SFX fY uïr uïrais/ uïr
SFX fY uïr uïrait/ uïr
SFX fY uïr uïrions/ uïr
SFX fY uïr uïriez/ uïr
SFX fY uïr uïraient/ uïr
SFX fY uïr uïsse/ uïr
SFX fY uïr uïsses/ uïr
SFX fY uïr uïsse/ uïr
SFX fY uïr uît/ uïr
SFX fY uïr uïs/ uïr
SFX fY uïr uïssons/ uïr
SFX fY uïr uïssez/ uïr

SFX p+ Y 8
SFX p+ er é/ er
SFX p+ er és/ er
SFX p+ er ée/ er
SFX p+ er ées/ er
SFX p+ ir i/ ir
SFX p+ ir is/ ir
SFX p+ ir ie/ ir
SFX p+ ir ies/ ir

SFX p. Y 2
SFX p. er é/ er
SFX p. ir i/ ir

SFX i0 Y 39
SFX i0 enir enir/ enir
SFX i0 enir enant/ enir
SFX i0 enir iens/ enir
SFX i0 enir ient/ enir
SFX i0 enir enons/ enir
SFX i0 enir enez/ enir
SFX i0 enir iennent/ enir
SFX i0 enir enais/ enir
SFX i0 enir enait/ enir
SFX i0 enir enions/ enir
SFX i0 enir eniez/ enir
SFX i0 enir enaient/ enir
SFX i0 enir ins/ enir
SFX i0 enir int/ enir
SFX i0 enir înmes/ enir
SFX i0 enir întes/ enir
SFX i0 enir inrent/ enir
SFX i0 enir iendrai/ enir
SFX i0 enir iendras/ enir
SFX i0 enir iendra/ enir
SFX i0 enir iendrons/ enir
SFX i0 enir iendrez/ enir
SFX i0 enir iendront/ enir
SFX i0 enir iendrais/ enir
SFX i0 enir iendrait/ enir
SFX i0 enir iendrions/ enir
SFX i0 enir iendriez/ enir
SFX i0 enir iendraient/ enir
SFX i0 enir ienne/ enir
SFX i0 enir iennes/ enir
SFX i0 enir insse/ enir
SFX i0 enir insses/ enir
SFX i0 enir înt/ enir
SFX i0 enir inssions/ enir
SFX i0 enir inssiez/ enir
SFX i0 enir inssent/ enir
SFX i0 enir iens/ enir
SFX i0 enir enons/ enir
SFX i0 enir enez/ enir

SFX i5 Y 39
SFX i5 tir tir/ tir
SFX i5 tir tant/ tir
SFX i5 tir s/ tir
SFX i5 tir t/ tir
SFX i5 tir tons/ tir
SFX i5 tir tez/ tir
SFX i5 tir tent/ tir
SFX i5 tir tais/ tir
SFX i5 tir tait/ tir
SFX i5 tir tions/ tir
SFX i5 tir tiez/ tir
SFX i5 tir taient/ tir
SFX i5 tir tis/ tir
SFX i5 tir tit/ tir
SFX i5 tir tîmes/ tir
SFX i5 tir tîtes/ tir
SFX i5 tir tirent/ tir
SFX i5 tir tirai/ tir
SFX i5 tir tiras/ tir
SFX i5 tir tira/ tir
SFX i5 tir tirons/ tir
SFX i5 tir tirez/ tir
SFX i5 tir tiront/ tir
SFX i5 tir tirais/ tir
SFX i5 tir tirait/ tir
SFX i5 tir tirions/ tir
SFX i5 tir tiriez/ tir
SFX i5 tir tiraient/ tir
SFX i5 tir te/ tir
SFX i5 tir tes/ tir
SFX i5 tir tisse/ tir
SFX i5 tir tisses/ tir
SFX i5 tir tît/ tir
SFX i5 tir tissions/ tir
SFX i5 tir tissiez/ tir
SFX i5 tir tissent/ tir
SFX i5 tir s/ tir
SFX i5 tir tons/ tir
SFX i5 tir tez/ tir

SFX iA Y 19
SFX iA dvenir dvenir/ venir
SFX iA dvenir dvenant/ venir
SFX iA dvenir dvenu/ venir
SFX iA dvenir dvenus/ venir
SFX iA dvenir dvenue/ venir
SFX iA dvenir dvenues/ venir
SFX iA dvenir dvient/ venir
SFX iA dvenir dviennent/ venir
SFX iA dvenir dvenait/ venir
SFX iA dvenir dvenaient/ venir
SFX iA dvenir dvint/ venir
SFX iA dvenir dvinrent/ venir
SFX iA dvenir dviendra/ venir
SFX iA dvenir dviendront/ venir
SFX iA dvenir dviendrait/ venir
SFX iA dvenir dviendraient/ venir
SFX iA dvenir dvienne/ venir
SFX iA dvenir dvînt/ venir
SFX iA dvenir dvinssent/ venir

SFX iB Y 40
SFX iB partenir partenir/ tenir
SFX iB partenir partenant/ tenir
SFX iB partenir partenu/ tenir
SFX iB partenir partiens/ tenir
SFX iB partenir partient/ tenir
SFX iB partenir partenons/ tenir
SFX iB partenir partenez/ tenir
SFX iB partenir partiennent/ tenir
SFX iB partenir partenais/ tenir
SFX iB partenir partenait/ tenir
SFX iB partenir partenions/ tenir
SFX iB partenir parteniez/ tenir
SFX iB partenir partenaient/ tenir
SFX iB partenir partins/ tenir
SFX iB partenir partint/ tenir
SFX iB partenir partînmes/ tenir
SFX iB partenir partîntes/ tenir
SFX iB partenir partinrent/ tenir
SFX iB partenir partiendrai/ tenir
SFX iB partenir partiendras/ tenir
SFX iB partenir partiendra/ tenir
SFX iB partenir partiendrons/ tenir
SFX iB partenir partiendrez/ tenir
SFX iB partenir partiendront/ tenir
SFX iB partenir partiendrais/ tenir
SFX iB partenir partiendrait/ tenir
SFX iB partenir partiendrions/ tenir
SFX iB partenir partiendriez/ tenir
SFX iB partenir partiendraient/ tenir
SFX iB partenir partienne/ tenir
SFX iB partenir partiennes/ tenir
SFX iB partenir partinsse/ tenir
SFX iB partenir partinsses/ tenir
SFX iB partenir partînt/ tenir
SFX iB partenir partinssions/ tenir
SFX iB partenir partinssiez/ tenir
SFX iB partenir partinssent/ tenir
SFX iB partenir partiens/ tenir
SFX iB partenir partenons/ tenir
SFX iB partenir partenez/ tenir
