vim/st.dic
abonnir/f0p+
abrutir/f0p+
abstenir/i0q+
accoutrer/a0p+
adoucir/f0p+
advenir/iA
affiner/a0p+
affranchir/f0p+
aguerrir/f0p+
ahaner/a0p.
alentir/f0p+
alunir/f0p+
ameublir/f0p+
amortir/f0p+
amuïr/fY
anéantir/f0p+
aplanir/f0p+
apostasier/a0p.
appartenir/iB
applaudir/f0p+
appuyer/a0p+
artiller/a0p.
assagir/f0p+
assoler/a0p+
assortir/f0p+
assouvir/f0p+
attiédir/f0p+
avaler/a0p+
avilir/f0p+
badiner/a0p.
banquer/a0p.
baquer/a0p+
bavarder/a0p.
beloter/a0p.
bénir/f0p+
bifurquer/a0p.
biologiser/a0p+
bisquer/a0p.
bleuir/f0p+
blondoyer/a0p.
boubouler/a0p.
boucharder/a0p+
bouffir/f0p+
bourgeonner/a0p.
briller/a0p.
brinquebaler/a0p+
bruncher/a0p.
caboter/a0p.
cagnarder/a0p.
caler/a0p+
calmir/f0p.
caner/a0p.
carcailler/a0p.
carrer/a0p+
chalouper/a0p.
chantonner/a0p+
chauvir/f0p.
chinoiser/a0p.
chouchouter/a0p+
ciller/a0p.
circonvenir/i0q+
clasher/a0p.
cloper/a0p.
cochonner/a0p+
cohériter/a0p.
compatir/f0p.
compétitionner/a0p.
complexifier/a0p+
consentir/i5q+
constituer/a0p+
contenir/i0q+
contrevenir/i0q+
convenir/i0q+
converger/a0p.
coorganiser/a0p+
courailler/a0p.
cramponner/a0p+
crapaüter/a0p.
crépir/f0p+
croasser/a0p.
damasser/a0p+
dansoter/a0p.
débriefer/a0p+
décatir/f0p+
décimaliser/a0p+
déconner/a0p.
décrémenter/a0p+
défléchir/f0p+
déforester/a0p+
dégarnir/f0p+
dégrossir/f0p+
dégrouiller/a0p+
déjeuner/a0p.
démaquiller/a0p+
démentir/i5q+
démolir/f0p+
dénitrifier/a0p+
départir/i5q+
déplaner/a0p.
dépolir/f0p+
désaffilier/a0p+
désalper/a0p.
désemplir/f0p+
désenchainer/a0p+
désétablir/f0p+
désincarcérer/c0p+
dessertir/f0p+
déstabiliser/a0p+
détenir/i0q+
devenir/i0q+
dévirginer/a0p+
deviser/a0p.
disconvenir/i0q+
disloquer/a0p+
disserter/a0p.
divertir/f0p+
douiller/a0p.
duplexer/a0p+
ébaubir/f0p+
écatir/f0p+
éclater/a0p+
effleurir/f0p.
égarer/a0p+
émaner/a0p.
embêter/a0p+
emboutir/f0p+
empalmer/a0p+
encaver/a0p+
enchérir/f0p+
enfiler/a0p+
enfouir/f0p+
enlaidir/f0p+
enluminer/a0p+
ensevelir/f0p+
entourer/a0p+
entrehaïr/fB
entretenir/i0q+
épanouir/f0p+
éperonner/a0p+
ergoter/a0p.
espérer/c0p+
estourbir/f0p+
étrangler/a0p+
évanouir/f0p+
exister/a0p.
expectorer/a0p+
fainéantiser/a0p.
favoriser/a0p+
feignanter/a0p.
flânocher/a0p.
flauper/a0p+
fléchir/f0p+
fluber/a0p.
forcir/f0p.
fouir/f0p+
fractionner/a0p+
fraîchir/f0p.
froufrouter/a0p.
fuir/f0p+
galoper/a0p+
gambiller/a0p.
gaudir/f0p+
germer/a0p.
glandouiller/a0p.
gober/a0p+
goder/a0p.
gouttiner/a8p.
grandir/f0p+
grigner/a0p.
grogner/a0p+
grognonner/a0p.
haïr/fA
havir/f0p+
hercher/a0p.
heurter/a0p+
imbiber/a0p+
impartir/fC
inférer/c0p+
infléchir/f0p+
intérioriser/a0p+
intervenir/i0q+
investir/f0p+
iouler/a0p.
jobarder/a0p+
koter/a0p.
languir/f0p+
lemmatiser/a0p+
louvoyer/a0p.
lyncher/a0p+
maintenir/i0q+
maraver/a0p+
matir/f0p+
médiser/a0p.
mégoter/a0p+
mentir/i5q.
mixtionner/a0p+
moisir/f0p+
morfaler/a0p.
munir/f0p+
murir/f0p+
nidifier/a0p.
noircir/f0p+
normaliser/a0p+
obscurcir/f0p+
obtenir/i0q+
obvenir/i0q+
orbiter/a0p.
organsiner/a0p+
panacher/a0p+
parlementer/a0p.
partir/i5q+
parvenir/i0q+
pavaner/a0p+
pédaler/a0p.
périr/f0p.
pester/a0p.
piéger/c0p+
pindariser/a0p.
pleuvioter/a8p.
pluraliser/a0p+
pouffer/a0p.
pourrir/f0p+
préaviser/a0p+
prémunir/f0p+
pressentir/i5q+
prévenir/i0q+
prioriser/a0p+
provenir/i0q+
quadriller/a0p+
quimper/a0p.
rabougrir/f0p+
raffermir/f0p+
ragrandir/f0p+
ramollir/f0p+
rappliquer/a0p.
rappointir/f0p+
rassurer/a0p+
réagir/f0p.
reblanchir/f0p+
recolorer/a0p+
reconvertir/f0p+
récriminer/a0p.
redevenir/i0q+
réfléchir/f0p+
reformater/a0p+
regarnir/f0p+
rejaillir/f0p.
remixer/a0p+
remplir/f0p+
renauder/a0p.
repartir/f0p+
repartir/i5q+
repentir/i5q+
reprographier/a0p+
resalir/f0p+
ressentir/i5q+
ressortir/i5q+
ressouvenir/i0q+
ressurgir/f0p.
retenir/i0q+
rétrécir/f0p+
rétropédaler/a0p.
revenir/i0q+
reverdir/f0p+
rhumer/a0p+
rondir/f0p+
ronfler/a0p.
rouir/f0p+
saisir/f0p+
sangloter/a0p.
sceller/a0p+
sentir/i5q+
sertir/f0p+
skater/a0p.
sortir/fD
sortir/i5q+
sourciller/a0p.
soutenir/i0q+
souvenir/i0q+
spammer/a0p+
subvenir/i0q.
superfinir/f0p+
surfer/a0p.
surfrapper/a0p+
survenir/i0q+
tapager/a0p.
tarir/f0p+
tenir/i0q+
tercer/a0p+
tituber/a0p.
tousser/a0p.
treillager/a0p+
trinquer/a0p.
unir/f0p+
valdinguer/a0p.
venir/i0q+
versifier/a0p+
vibrionner/a0p.
yoyoter/a0p.
